District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.17

Employee deferred compensation program established.

There is established an employee deferred compensation program as provided in the Deferred Compensation Act of 1984.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1118
as added Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-118, § 6(a), 31 DCR 4034
Employee deferred compensation program, see § 47-3601 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 1-612.17.
The “Deferred Compensation Act of 1984,” referred to at the end of the section, is D.C. Law 5-118.